Washington statutes.
RCW 27.34.330

Heritage capital projects—Proposals for funding—Prioritized list.

The Washington state historical society shall establish a competitive process to solicit proposals for and prioritize heritage capital projects for potential funding in the state capital budget. The society shall adopt rules governing project eligibility and evaluation criteria. Application for funding of specific projects may be made to the society by local governments, public development authorities, nonprofit corporations, tribal governments, and other entities, as determined by the society. The society, with the advice of leaders in the heritage field, including but not limited to representatives from the office of the secretary of state, the eastern Washington state historical society, and the department of archaeology and historic preservation, shall establish and submit a prioritized list of heritage capital projects to the governor and the legislature in the society's biennial capital budget request. The list shall include a description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding, and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. The total amount of recommended state funding for projects on a biennial project list shall not exceed ten million dollars. The prioritized list shall be developed through open and public meetings and the amount of state funding shall not exceed thirty-three and thirty-three one-hundredths percent of the total cost of the project. The nonstate portion of the total project cost may include cash, the value of real property when acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions. The department shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds under this section until the legislature has approved a specific list of projects. In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the society shall include provisions requiring that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7014; 2006 c 371 s 232; (2006 c 371 s 231 expired June 30, 2007). Prior: (2005 c 333 s 16 expired June 30, 2007); 2005 c 160 s 3; 1999 c 295 s 2; 1995 c 182 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 3: See note following RCW 43.160.080.

Effective date—2006 c 371 s 232: "Section 232 of this act takes effect June 30, 2007." [ 2006 c 371 s 239.]

Expiration dates—2006 c 371 ss 229 and 231: "(1) Section 229 of this act expires June 30, 2011.

(2) Section 231 of this act expires June 30, 2007." [ 2006 c 371 s 238.]

Effective date—2006 c 371: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 31, 2006]." [ 2006 c 371 s 242.]

Expiration date—2005 c 333 ss 16-18: "Sections 16 through 18 of this act expire June 30, 2007." [ 2005 c 333 s 26.]

Findings—1995 c 182: "The legislature finds that the state of Washington has a rich heritage in historical sites and artifacts that have the potential to provide lifelong learning opportunities for citizens of the state. Further, the legislature finds that many of these historical treasures are not readily accessible to citizens, and that there is a need to create an ongoing program to support the capital needs of heritage organizations and facilities." [ 1995 c 182 s 1.]